Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 12. Operation of Bicycles, Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Devices, and Play Vehicles

§ 1136.
Application of subchapter; rights and obligations of bicyclists under other laws.

The parent of any child and the guardian of any ward may not authorize or knowingly permit any such child or ward to violate any of the provisions of this subchapter.

This subchapter applies whenever a bicycle is operated upon any highway or upon any path set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles, subject to the exceptions stated in this subchapter.

Every person riding a bicycle is granted all of the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to operators of vehicles, except as to those provisions that:

are inconsistent with provisions that specifically address the rights and duties of vulnerable users generally or bicyclists specifically; or

by their very nature can have no application.

Except as provided in this subsection, motor-assisted bicycles shall be governed as bicycles under Vermont law, and operators of motor-assisted bicycles shall be subject to all of the rights and duties applicable to bicyclists under Vermont law. Motor-assisted bicycles and their operators shall be exempt from motor vehicle registration and inspection and operator’s license requirements. A person shall not operate a motor-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk in Vermont.
(d) (1) Except as provided in this subsection, motor-assisted bicycles shall be governed as bicycles under Vermont law, and operators of motor-assisted bicycles shall be subject to all of the rights and duties applicable to bicyclists under Vermont law. Motor-assisted bicycles and their operators shall be exempt from motor vehicle registration and inspection and operator’s license requirements. A person shall not operate a motor-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk in Vermont.

A person under 16 years of age shall not operate a motor-assisted bicycle on a highway in Vermont.

Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with the right of municipalities to regulate the operation and use of motor-assisted bicycles pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2291(1)

and (4), as long as the regulations do not conflict with this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 44, 57;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1136a.
Electric bicycles.

Except as provided in this subsection, electric bicycles shall be governed as bicycles under Vermont law, and operators of electric bicycles shall be subject to all of the rights and duties applicable to bicyclists under Vermont law.

Electric bicycles and their operators shall be exempt from:

motor vehicle registration, inspection, and certificate of title requirements under chapter 7 of this title, section 1222 of this title, and chapter 21, subchapter 2 of this title;

operator’s license requirements under chapter 9, subchapter 1 of this title;

financial responsibility requirements under chapter 11 of this title; and

requirements applicable to all-terrain vehicles under chapter 31 of this title.

An electric bicycle shall comply with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles promulgated by the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission, including 16 C.F.R. Part 1512 as may be amended, and may only be operated in such a way that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function when the operator stops pedaling or applies the brakes.

A class 3 electric bicycle shall be equipped with a speedometer that displays the speed the bicycle is traveling in miles per hour.

An electric bicycle may be ridden in places where bicycles are allowed, including highways, bicycle lanes, and bicycle or multiuse paths.
(e) (1) An electric bicycle may be ridden in places where bicycles are allowed, including highways, bicycle lanes, and bicycle or multiuse paths.

Following notice and a public hearing, a municipality, local authority, or State agency having jurisdiction over a bicycle or multiuse path may prohibit the operation of a class 1 electric bicycle or class 2 electric bicycle on that path if it finds that such a restriction is needed for safety reasons or compliance with other laws or legal obligations.

A municipality, local authority, or State agency having jurisdiction over a bicycle or multiuse path may prohibit the operation of a class 3 electric bicycle on that path.

This subsection shall not apply to a trail that is specifically designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials. A municipality, local authority, or State agency having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subdivision may regulate the use of an electric bicycle on that trail.

An individual under 16 years of age shall not operate a class 3 electric bicycle but may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers.

Subsection (g) effective January 1, 2022.

Manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle and shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type.

Subsection (h) effective January 1, 2022.

A person shall not tamper with or modify an electric bicycle so as to change the motor-powered speed capability or engagement of an electric bicycle unless the label indicating the classification required in subsection (g) of this section is replaced after modification.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 40

, § 6; amended

2021, No. 40

, § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 1137.
Riding on bicycles.

No individual propelling a bicycle may ride other than on or astride a permanent and regular seat attached to the bicycle.

No individual may use a bicycle to carry more individuals at any one time than the number for which it is designed and equipped.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 187.

§ 1138.
Clinging to motor vehicles.

No person may attach himself or herself or any bicycle, wagon, roller skates, sled, or toy vehicle upon which he or she is riding or will ride to any motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1139.
Riding on roadways and bicycle paths.

A person operating a bicycle upon a roadway shall exercise due care when passing a standing vehicle or one proceeding in the same direction. Bicyclists generally shall ride as near to the right side of the improved area of the highway right-of-way as is safe, except that a bicyclist:

Shall ride to the left or in a left lane when:

preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private roadway or driveway;

approaching an intersection with a right-turn lane if not turning right at the intersection; or

overtaking another vulnerable user.

May ride to the left or in a left lane when taking reasonably necessary precautions to avoid hazards or road conditions. Examples include objects on the road, parked or moving vehicles, pedestrians, animals, surface conditions that may impair the bicyclist’s stability, or safety hazards caused by a narrow road or steep embankment, road geometry, or unfavorable atmospheric conditions.

Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway may not ride more than two abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or except as otherwise permitted by the Commissioner of Public Safety in connection with a public sporting event in which case the Commissioner shall be authorized to adopt such rules as the public good requires. Persons riding two abreast shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and, on a laned roadway, shall ride within a single lane.

[Repealed.]

Bicycles may be operated on the shoulders of partially controlled access highways, which are those highways where access is controlled by public authority but where there are some connections with selected public highways, some crossings at grade, and some private driveway connections. The Traffic Committee may determine that any portion of these highways is unsafe and therefore closed to bicycle operation.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1989, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 1990;

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. April 1, 1993;

1993, No. 8

, § 1;

1999, No. 18

, § 41u, eff. May 13, 1999;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 38, eff. June 9, 2004;

2009, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 44.

§ 1140.
Carrying articles.

No person operating a bicycle may carry any package, bundle, or article that prevents the driver from keeping at least one hand upon the handlebars.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1141.
Equipment on bicycles.

A person shall not operate a bicycle at nighttime from one-half hour after sunset until one-half hour before sunrise unless the bicycle or the bicyclist is equipped with a lamp on the front which emits a white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the front. In addition, bicyclists shall operate during these hours with either a lamp on the rear of the bicycle or bicyclist that emits a flashing or steady red light visible at least 300 feet to the rear, or with reflective, rear-facing material or reflectors, or both, with a surface area totaling at least 20 square inches on the bicycle or bicyclist and visible at least 300 feet to the rear.

No person may equip a bicycle with any siren or whistle, or any device simulating a siren of an authorized emergency vehicle, nor may he or she operate a bicycle so equipped.

No person may operate a bicycle unless it is equipped with a brake that will enable the operator to make the braked wheels skid on dry, level, clean pavement.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1979, No. 22

;

2009, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1141a.
Electric personal assistive mobility devices (EPAMD); required equipment; operation.

Equipment. An electric personal assistive mobility device shall be equipped as follows:

with front, rear, and side reflectors; and

with a system that will enable the operator to bring the device to a controlled stop; and

if the device is operated between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise, with a lamp emitting a white light that, while the device is in motion, shall illuminate the area in front of the operator.

Rights and duties of operator. The operator of an EPAMD shall have the rights and duties of pedestrians as set forth in chapter 13, subchapter 5 of this title.

Hazardous materials. No person shall carry or transport on an EPAMD any hazardous materials as defined in

5 V.S.A. § 2001

. Civil penalties imposed for violations of this subsection shall be in accordance with civil penalties imposed for violations of

5 V.S.A. § 2001

.

Municipal authority. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of a municipality under the provisions of

24 V.S.A. § 2291(1)

, (4), and (5) to regulate the use and operation of EPAMDs.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 188.

§ 1142.
Penalties.

A person who violates any provision of sections 1136 through 1141 and subsection 1141a(a) of this title shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $25.00 for each offense, except that a person who violates subsection 1139(b) of this title shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2001, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 189.

§ 1143.
Not evidence of negligence.

A violation of any provision of sections 1136 through 1141 of this title by any person under 16 years of age is not negligence or evidence of negligence.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.